Hawaii, session 2026, SB262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 612-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Juror qualification form" means the juror qualification form described in section 612-13." SECTION 2.  Section 612-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) The clerk shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names in the master jury wheel, which shall not be disclosed to any person other than pursuant to this chapter or specific order of the court. The clerk or the clerk's designee shall [mail] make available to every name on the list a juror qualification form accompanied by instructions to fill out and return the form [by mail] to the clerk or the clerk's designee within ten days after its receipt[.]; provided that the court shall determine the format of the form and the means of its delivery and return; provided further that the court may contact any one juror more than once and by more than one method. The form shall be subject to approval by the court and shall elicit the name, address, and age of the prospective juror, other information pertinent to disqualification or exemption from jury service, and any other matters as may be ordered by the court.  The form also shall contain the prospective juror's declaration that the prospective juror's responses are true to the best of the prospective juror's knowledge and the prospective juror's acknowledgment that a wilful misrepresentation of a material fact may be punished by a fine of not more than $500 or imprisonment for not more than thirty days, or both. Notarization of the juror qualification form shall not be required.  If the prospective juror is unable to fill out the form, another person may do it for the prospective juror and shall indicate that the person has done so and the reason therefor.  In any case in which it appears that there is an omission, ambiguity, or error in a form completed by a prospective juror, the clerk or the clerk's designee may return the form with instructions to the prospective juror to make such additions or corrections as may be necessary and to return the form to the clerk or the clerk's designee within ten days after its receipt.  Upon the failure or refusal of any person duly receiving the juror qualification form to complete and return it as required or instructed, the court, after first summoning the person to appear before the clerk to complete or correct the form, may punish the person for contempt." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on April 23, 2057.